Utah statutes.
75-2-505.   Who may witness.

(1)  An individual generally competent to be a witness may act as a witness to a will.

(2)  The signing of a will by an interested witness does not invalidate the will or any provision of it.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 39, 1998 General Session

